New Jersey, session 221, S1233.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   In addition to the transfers of property exempt from taxation pursuant to R.S.54:34-4, an amount equal to the value of any eligible restitution payment or distribution received by a decedent during the life of the decedent and transferred at death or in contemplation of death to a beneficiary or beneficiaries other than the estate or the executor or administrator of that decedent is exempt from the transfer inheritance tax imposed by R.S.54:33-1 et seq. b.    The value of any eligible restitution payment or distribution received by a decedent during the life of the decedent shall be determined for purposes of the exemption allowed pursuant to this section based upon the clear market value of the payment or distribution on the date the payment or distribution is received by the decedent. c.     If the value of any eligible restitution payment or distribution received by a decedent during the life of the decedent is transferred to two or more beneficiaries at death or in contemplation of death, the amount of the exemption allowed pursuant to this section shall be allocated to each beneficiary receiving a taxable transfer of property in proportion to the amount the beneficiarys transfer bears to the total amount of all taxable transfers made from the estate of the decedent. d.    As used in this section: Eligible descendant of an eligible individual means an individual who is lineally related to an eligible individual, by blood, affinity, or adoption, and who is not more than two generations removed in descent from the eligible individual. Eligible restitution payment or distribution means any payment or distribution that: (1)   is paid to the decedent by reason of the decedents status as an eligible individual or by reason of the decedents status as an eligible descendant of an eligible individual, including any amount paid by a foreign country, the United States of America, or any other foreign or domestic entity, or a fund established by any country or entity, any amount paid as a result of a final resolution of a legal action, and any amount paid under a law providing for payments or restitution of property; (2)   constitutes the direct or indirect return to the decedent of, or compensation or reparation paid to the decedent for, assets stolen, hidden, or otherwise lost to an eligible individual before, during, or immediately after World War II by reason of the decedents status as an eligible individual or by reason of the decedents status as an eligible descendant of an eligible individual, including any proceeds of insurance under policies issued on eligible individuals by European insurance companies immediately before and during World War II; or (3)   consists of interest that is paid as part of any payment or distribution described by paragraph (1) or paragraph (2). Eligible individual means an individual who was persecuted for racial or religious reasons by Nazi Germany, any other Axis regime, or any other Nazi-controlled or Nazi-allied country. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to transfers associated with deaths occurring on or after the 90th day next following the date of enactment.